yeoman-custom/cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/ta_rules
_கமெண்) ட		t.V#
_ரிப்போர்) ட		t.V#
அL04ால்) ட		t.V#
அர்ஜண்) ட		t.V#
அர்ஜெண்) ட		t.V#
இண்டர்மீடியே) ட		t.V#
     _) ட (ஃப்		t.V
     _) ட (க்கர		t.V
    ங்) ட (ன		t.V	// -ington
  _நியூ) ட (ன		t.V
  _மில்) ட (ன		t.V
     _) ட (ன்		t.V
     _) ட (ப்_		t.V
     _) டப்ப (ில	t.Vbb
    _) ட (ம்ப்லர		t.V
     _) ட (ம்ப்ளர	t.V
     _) ட (ம்ளர		t.V
     _) ட (யரில		t.V
    _) ட (யரு		t.V
     _) ட (யர்		t.V
 _ப்ரிண்) ட (ர		t.V
 _ஸ்கூ) ட (ர		t.V
என்கவுண்) ட (ர		t.V
என்கௌண்) ட (ர		t.V
   சானி) ட (ரி		t.V
  _மில) ட (ரி		t.V
  _மிலி) ட (ரி		t.V
  இண்) ட (ர்		t.V
   எண்) டர்பி (ரைL04		t.Vrp
 _மெண்) ட (ல		t.V
     _) ட (வர		t.V
     _) ட (வல		t.V
     _) ட (வுன		t.V
  ஸ்டே) ட (ஸ		t.V
   அல்) ட (ா		t.
   உல்) ட (ா		t.
  _மால்) ட (ா		t.
     _) டாக் (_		t.a:k
     _) ட (ாக்க		t.  // talkies
     _) டாக்ட (ர	d.a:kt.V
     _) டாக (்ஸி		t.a:k
     _) டாங்க (ர		t.a:NkV
     _) டாங்க (ி		t.a:Nk
     _) டாட (ா		t.a:t.
     _) டானிக்		t.a:nik
     _) ட (ான்சானிய	t.
     _) ட (ான்ஜானிய	t.
     _) டாபிக்		t.a:pik
     _) ட (ாமி		t.
     _) டாய்லட்		t.a:jlVt.
     _) டாய்லெட்		t.a:jlet.
  அண்) டார்டிக		t.a:rt.ikV#
     _) ட (ாலமி		t.
     _) ட (ால்ஸ்டாய	t.
     _) ட (ாஸ்மாக்	t.
  _டியூ) ட (ி		t.
  _ட்யூ) ட (ி		t.
 _சேஃப்) ட (ி		t.
 _ராயல்) ட (ி		t.
_க்வாலி) ட (ி		t.
_நாவல்) ட (ி		t.
     _) டி(ரையல	t.
     _) ட (ிஃபன	t.
 _போர்) ட (ிகோ		t.
   ஆர்) டிக்		t.ik
     _) ட (ிக்க		t.
  _மார்) ட (ின		t.
  காண்) டினெண்ட (ல	t.inen.t.V
  கான்) டினென்ட (ல 	t.inent.V
     _) ட (ின்		t.
     _) டின்க (ரிங்	t.inkV
   _சர்) டிபிகேட		t.ifige:t.V#
     _) ட (ிப்ஸ		t.
     _) டி (யூசன	t.
     _) டியூட (ி	d.jU:t.
     _) டி (யூன	t.
     _) டி (யூஷன	t.
     _) டி (ரங்		t.
     _) டி (ரங்கு	t.
     _) டிரம்பெட்	t.rVmpet.
     _) டிர (ஸ		d.re
     _) டிர (ஸ்ட	t.rV
     _) டிராஃபிக்	t.ra:fik
     _) டி (ராகுலா	d.
     _) டிராக்		t.ra:k
 _காண்) டி (ராக்டர	t.
     _) டி (ராஜ		t.
     _) டி (ரான்சிஸ்டர	t.
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்ஃபர	t.
     _) டிரான்ஸ்ப (ர	t.ra:nsfV
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்பாண்டர	t.
     _) டிரான்ஸ்பிரண்ட	t.ra:nspirVn.t.V#
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்மீட்டர	t.
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்லே	t.
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்வேல	t.
     _) டிராபிக்		t.ra:fik
     _) ட (ிராம		t.
கொலஸ்) டி (ரால		_|t.
     _) டி (ராலி	t.
     _) டி (ராவல	t.
     _) டி (ராவெல	t.
     _) டிரிக (ர		t.riggV
     _) டிரிக்		t.rik
     _) டிரிக்க (ர	t.riggV
     _) டி (ரிம்		t.
     _) டிரீட்		t.ri:t.
     _) டிரெயி(லர	t.rej
     _) டி (ரெயின	t.
     _) டி (ரெய்லர	t.
     _) டி (ரெஸ	d.
     _) டிரேயின (ை	t.re:jn
     _) டி (ரை_		d.
     _) டி (ரை_செஞ்ச	t.
     _) டி (ரை_செய்	t.
     _) டி (ரை_பண்	t.
     _) டி (ரைவ	d.
   கண்) டி (ரோல	t.
     _) ட (ிவிக		t.
     _) ட (ிவிய	t.
     _) ட (ிவில	t.
 _காண்) ட (ீன		t.
 _கேண்) ட (ீன		t.
     _) ட (ுனிசியா	t.
     _) ட (ுனிஸ	t.
     _) ட (ுனீL04	t.
     _) ட (ுனீஷிய	t.
   _கார்) ட (ூன		t.
     _) ட (ூர		t.
     _) டெக் (னாலஜி	t.ek
     _) டெக்னிக (ல	t.eknikV
     _) ட (ெக்ஸாஸ	t.
     _) ட (ெண்டுல்கர	t.
     _) டென்டுல்க (ர	t.ent.UlkV
_டேபிள்_) ட (ென்னிஸ	t.
_லான்_) ட (ென்னிஸ	t.
    _) ட (ென்னிஸ்_கோர்ட		t.
    _) ட (ென்னிஸ்_பந்த		t.
    _) ட (ென்னிஸ்_மேச்		t.
     _) ட (ென்ஷன	t.
     _) டெம்ப (ர		t.empV
     _) டெம்ப (ோ	t.emp
     _) டெலஸ்கோப்	t.elVsko:p
     _) ட (ெலிஃபோன	t.
     _) டெலிகீ (ராம	t.elig
     _) டெலிபத (ி	t.elipVt
     _) டெலிபிரிண்ட (ர	t.eliprint.V
	டெலிப (ோன	t.elif
     _) ட (ெலிவிஷன	t.
     _) ட (ெல்_அவீவ	t.  // tel aviv
     _) டெஸ்ட		t.est.V#
 _வெஜி) ட (ே		t.
     _) டேக்		t.e:k
     _) டேங்க (ர		t.e:NkV
     _) ட (ேப		t.
     _) ட (ேஸ்ட		t.
    _) டைட (ில		t.aIt.
     _) டைப்		t.aIp
     _) ட (ைம்_		t.
     _) ட (ோக்கன	t.
     _) ட (ோக்கியோ	t.
     _) டோரண்ட (ோ	t.o:rVn.t.
  _ப்ரி) ட (ோரிய	t.
 @மெண்) ட்		t.     // -ment
இண்டர்நெ) ட்		t.
    _ல) ட்ட		d.d.V#
   _ரெ) ட்ட (ியா		d.d.
    இ) ட்ட (ிலி		d.d.
அப்பாயிண்) ட்மெண்ட	t.men.t.V#
     _) ட் (யூசன	t.
     _) ட் (யூன		t.
    ஸ்) ட் (ர		_|t.  // ?? make t. distinct
     _) ட் (ரங்		t.
     _) ட் (ரங்கு		t.
     _) ட்ரம்பெட்		t.rVmpet.
     _) ட் (ரஸ்ட		t.
    _த) ட் (ரா		t.
    _நீ) ட் (ரா		t.
    ஆ) ட் (ரா		t.
     _) ட்ராஃபிக்		t.ra:fik
     _) ட்ராக்		t.ra:k
 _காண்) ட் (ராக்டர		t.
     _) ட் (ராஜ		t.
  _நியூ) ட் (ரான	t.
     _) ட (்ரான்சிஸ்டர	t.
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்ஃபர	t.
     _) ட்ரான்ஸ்ப (ர	t.ra:nsfV
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்பாண்டர	t.
     _) ட்ரான்ஸ்பிரண்ட	t.ra:nspirVn.t.V#
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்மீட்டர	t.
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்லே	t.
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்வேல	t.
     _) ட்ராபிக்		t.ra:fik
     _) ட் (ராலி		t.
     _) ட் (ராவல		t.
     _) ட் (ராவெல	t.
     _) ட்ரிக (ர		t.riggV
     _) ட்ரிக்		t.rik
     _) ட்ரிக்க (ர		t.riggV
     _) ட் (ரிம்		t.
     _) ட்ரீட்		t.ri:t.
    _வி) ட் (ரு		t.
   _கே) ட் (ரு		t.
  _போ) ட் (ரு		t.
     _) ட்ரெயி (லர	t.rej
     _) ட் (ரெய்லர	t.
     _) ட் (ரை_செஞ்ச	t.
     _) ட் (ரை_செய்	t.
     _) ட் (ரை_பண்	t.
     _) ட் (ரையல	t.
   _பெ) ட் (ரோ		t.
  _மெ) ட் (ரோ		t.
   கண்) ட் (ரோல		t.
    _த) ட் (றா		t.
    _நீ) ட் (றா		t.
    ஆ) ட் (றா		t.
    _த) ட் (ல		t.
    _வீ) ட் (ல		t.
   _கா) ட் (ல		t.
   _கூ) ட் (ல		t.
   _நா) ட் (ல		t.
   _பா) ட் (ல		t.
   _மே) ட் (ல		t.
   _ரூ) ட் (ல		t.
  _நோ) ட் (ல		t.
  _ரோ) ட் (ல		t.
_நடுரோ) ட் (ல		t.
    இ) ட் (லர		t.
   _ஹி) ட் (லர		t.
     அ) ட்லாண்ட		t.la:n.t.V#  // atlant
//endsort


.group ண
	ண	n.V
	ண (B	n.


.group த
	த	dV
	த (B	d
     _) த	tV
     _) த (B	t
     _) த (T	dV	// if word has $alt attribute in ta_list
     _) த (BT+	d	// if word has $alt
	த்த	ttV
	த்த (B	tt
    க்) த	tV
    க்) த (B	t
    ஸ்) த	tV
    ஸ்) த (B	t
     ப்) த	tV
     ப்) த (B	t

	// exceptions, த as [d]

//sort
      _) த (L04ாவதார	dV
     _) த (கதக		dV
     _) த (கன		dV
     _) த (கி		dV
     _) த (க்க்ஷிண	dV
     _) த (க்ஷிண	dV
     _) த (க்ஷிணா	dV
     _) த (சகண்ட	dV
     _) த (சமி		dV
     _) த (சரத		dV
     _) த (சரதர		dV
     _) த (சரா		dV
     _) த (சாப்த		dV
     _) த (சை		dV
     _) த (டதட		dV
     _) த (டபுடல	dV
     _) த (டவை		dV
     _) த (டால		dV
     _) த (டிJ_பயல	dV
     _) த (டிJ_புத்தக	dV
     _) த (டிJ_மாட	dV
     _) த (டிக்காம	dV
     _) த (டிக்கும	dV
     _) த (டித்த		dV
     _) த (டிப்		dV
     _) த (டிமன	dV
     _) த (டிமாட	dV
     _) த (டியன	dV
     _) த (டியர		dV
     _) த (ட்சசீல		dV
     _) த (ட்சன		dV
     _) த (ட்சிண	dV
     _) த (ண்டக்		dV
     _) த (ண்டத்		dV
     _) த (ண்டன		dV
     _) த (ண்டபாணி	dV
     _) த (ண்டம		dV
     _) த (ண்டாயுதபாணி	dV
     _) த (ண்டிக்க	dV
     _) த (ண்டித்	dV
     _) த (ண்டிப்ப	dV
     _) த (ண்டிப்பா	dV
     _) த (ண்டியுங்கள	dV
     _) த (ண்டோரா	dV
     _) தத்த (ியா	dVdd
     _) த (னகோடி	dV
     _) த (னசேகரன	dV
     _) த (னன்ஜெயன	dV
     _) த (னபால		dV
     _) த (னராச		dV
     _) த (னராஜ		dV
     _) த (னலக்ஷ்மி	dV
     _) த (னலட்சுமி	dV
     _) த (னுஷ		dV
     _) த (ன்மந்திரி	dV
     _) த (ன்ராஜ		dV
     _) தபதப		dVbVdVbV#
     _) த (மயந்தி	dV
     _) த (ம்பதி		dV
     _) த (ம்பிடி	dV
     _) த (யவ		dV
     _) த (யாணந்த	dV
     _) த (யால		dV
     _) த (யாள		dV
     _) த (யை		dV
     _) த (ரணி		dV
     _) த (ராவிய	dV
     _) த (ரிசனங்	dV
     _) த (ரிசனத்	dV
     _) த (ரிசி		dV
     _) த (ரித்திரம	dV
     _) த (ருமச்		dV
     _) த (ருமத்		dV
     _) த (ருமன		dV
     _) தருமப (ுரி	dVrUmVp
     _) த (ருமம		dV
     _) த (ருமர		dV
     _) த (ருமி		dV
     _) த (ர்கா		dV
     _) தர்க்க (ா		dVgg
     _) த (ர்பார		dV
     _) த (ர்பூச		dV
     _) த (ர்பை		dV
     _) த (ர்ம		dV
     _) த (லித்		dV
     _) த (வக்கோல	dV
     _) த (வத்த		dV
     _) த (வப்		dV
     _) த (வம		dV
     _) தவுலதாப (ாத	dVvUlVda:b
     _) த (ாக்கா		d
     _) த (ாக்காம		t
     _) த (ாக்காவிட்டா	t
     _) த (ாச		d
     _) த (ாசில்தார	t
     _) த (ாடி		d
     _) த (ாட்சண்ய	d
     _) த (ாட்சாய	d
     _) த (ாதா		d
     _) த (ானங்		d
     _) த (ானத்		d
     _) த (ானப்		d
     _) த (ானமா		d
     _) த (ானிய		d
     _) த (ானியங்கி	t
     _) த (ானுவ		d
     _) த (ாமோதர	d
     _) த (ாம்_தூம	d
     _) த (ாயாதி	d
     _) த (ாரணி		d
     _) த (ாரா_சிக்கோ	d
     _) த (ாரா_சிங்	d
     _) த (ாரா_ஷிகோ	d
     _) த (ாராசுர		d
     _) த (ாராபுர	d
     _) த (ாராள		d
     _) த (ாராவி		d
     _) த (ாவணி	d
     _) த (ாவா		d
     _) த (ாவேய		d
     _) த (ாஸ		d
     _) த (ிகம்பர	d
     _) த (ிகில		d
     _) த (ிகுதிகு	d
     _) த (ிக்கில	d
     _) த (ிக்கு		d
     _) த (ிக்கு_முக்க	t
     _) த (ிக்கு_வாய	t
     _) த (ிக்குமுக்கா	t
     _) த (ிக்கென	d
     _) த (ிக்கே		d
     _) த (ிக்கை		d
     _) திக்த (ிக்யெ	digd
     _) திக்பி (ரமை	digb
     _) த (ிக்விஜய	d
     _) த (ிசை		d
     _) த (ிடகாத்திர	d
     _) திடசங்கல்ப	did.VsVNgVlpV#
     _) த (ிடசித்த	d
     _) த (ிடப		d
     _) த (ிடம		d
     _) த (ிடீ		d
     _) த (ிடீர		d
     _) த (ிடுக்		d
     _) த (ிடுதிடு	d
     _) த (ிடுதிப்	d
     _) த (ிடும		d
     _) த (ிடுவெ	d
     _) த (ிண்டிவன	d
     _) த (ிண்டுக்கல	d
     _) த (ினக		d
     _) த (ினங்		d
     _) த (ினசரி	d
     _) த (ினத்		d
     _) த (ினந்		d
     _) த (ினப்படி	d
     _) த (ினம		d
     _) த (ினுச		d
     _) த (ினேஷ	d
     _) த (ிபுதிபு	d
     _) த (ிம்ம		d
     _) தி (யாக		t
     _) தி (யான		d
     _) த (ிரவ		d
     _) த (ிரவிய	d
     _) தி (ராட்சை	d
     _) தி (ராணி	t
     _) தி (ராவிட	d
     _) திரு (திரா	dri
     _) திரு (ஷ்டி	dri
     _) த (ிரௌபதி	d
     _) தி (ரௌபதி	t
     _) த (ில்லாக	d
     _) த (ில்லி		d
     _) த (ில்லு_	d
     _) த (ில்லு_முல்லு	t
     _) த (ிவச		d
     _) த (ிவாகர	d
     _) த (ிவான		d
     _) த (ிவால		d
     _) த (ிவ்ய		d
     _) த (ிவ்விய	d
     _) த (ீக்ஷிதர	d
     _) த (ீட்சண்ய	d
     _) த (ீட்சித		d
     _) த (ீட்சை		d
     _) த (ீப		d
     _) த (ீப்ப		t
     _) த (ீரக்கிழவ	d
     _) த (ீரச்		d
     _) த (ீரத்துட		d
     _) த (ீரன		d
     _) த (ீரமில்ல	d
     _) த (ீரமுட		d
     _) த (ீரம்மிக	d
     _) த (ீரர		d
     _) த (ீரரை		d
     _) த (ீர்க		d
     _) த (ீர்க்க		t
     _) தீர்க்க (தரிச	di:rggV
     _) த (ீர்க்கமா		d
     _) தீர்க்க (மி	di:rggV
     _) தீர்க்க (ம்_	di:rggV
     _) து(ரோக		d
     _) த (ுக்க		d
     _) த (ுச்சம		d
     _) த (ுச்சாதனன	d
     _) த (ுட்ட		d
     _) த (ுபாய		d
     _) த (ுபாஷி	d
     _) த (ுப்பட்டா	d
     _) த (ுமளி		d
     _) த (ுரதிருஷ்ட	d
     _) த (ுரதிர்ஷ்ட	d
     _) த (ுரதிஷ்ட	d
     _) த (ுராசை		d
     _) த (ுரியோதனன	d
     _) த (ுரியோதனா	d
     _) த (ுருவங்	d
     _) த (ுருவத்		d
     _) த (ுருவப்	d
     _) த (ுரை		d
     _) த (ுரோண	d
     _) து (ரோண	t
     _) த (ுர்		d
     _) து (வந்த_	d
     _) துவாப (ர	dva:pV
     _) துவ (ார		dv
     _) து (வேச		d
     _) து (வேஷ	d
     _) துவைத		dvaItV#
     _)	த (ுஷ்		d
     _) த (ூச		d
     _) த (ூசி		d
     _) த (ூப		d
     _) த (ூம		d
     _) த (ூர		d
     _) த (ூரத்_		t
     _) த (ூரத்துவ	t
     _) த (ூரத்தொட	t
     _) த (ூரன		t
     _) த (ூரல		t
     _) த (ூரிகை	t
     _) த (ூர்_		t
     _) த (ூர்ந்		t
     _) த (ூர்வ		t
     _) த (ூஷணை	d
     _) த (ூஷித்த	d
     _) த (ெண்ட		d
     _) த (ெய்வ		d
     _) த (ேக		d
     _) த (ேக்க		t
     _) த (ேச		d
     _) த (ேவகான	d
     _) த (ேவகி		d
     _) த (ேவகுல	d
     _) த (ேவக்		d
     _) த (ேவசேன	d
     _) த (ேவதூத	d
     _) த (ேவதை	d
     _) த (ேவநேய	d
     _) த (ேவன		d
     _) த (ேவராஜ	d
     _) த (ேவராட்டி	d
     _) த (ேவராணி	d
     _) த (ேவராள	d
     _) த (ேவருலக	d
     _) த (ேவர்க		d
     _) த (ேவலோக	d
     _) த (ேவஸ்தான	d
     _) த (ேவாதி	d
     _) த (ேவாமிருத	d
     _) த (ேவாம்ச	d
     _) த (ேவார		d
     _) த (ேவாலய	d
     _) த (ேவி		d
     _) த (ேவிடியா	t
     _) த (ேவேந்		d
     _) த (ைரிய		d
     _) த (ொனி		d
     _) த (ொபதொப	d
     _) த (ொபுக்	d
     _) த (ொப்புன	d
     _) த (ொப்பெ	d
     _) த (ொம்		d
     _) த (ோசை		d
     _) த (ோஷ		d
     _) த (ோஸ்த்		d
     _) த (ோஹா		d
     _) தௌலதாப (ாத	daUlVd.a:b
     _) த (்ராட்சை	d
//endsort
